fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-mêstakay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mêstakay - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, hair	AEW V-initial NDI2
     mêstakay+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: mêstakay
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nêstakay
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kêstakay
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nêstakânân
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kêstakânaw
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kêstakâwâw
     
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: wêstakay
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: wêstakâwâw
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: wêstakâyiw

     mêstakay+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: mêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nêstakânâna
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kêstakânawa
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kêstakâwâwa
     
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: wêstakaya
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: wêstakâwâwa
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: wêstakâyiwa

     mêstakay+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: mêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nêstakânâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kêstakânâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kêstakâwâhk

     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: wêstakâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: wêstakâwâhk
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: wêstakâyihk

     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [mêscakâs,     mêscakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nêscakâs,     nêscakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kêscakâs,     kêscakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nêscakâsinân, nêscakâsisinân]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kêscakâsinaw, kêscakâsisinaw]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kêscakâsiwâw, kêscakâsisiwâw]

     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [wêscakâs,     wêscakâsis]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [wêscakâsiwâw, wêscakâsisiwâw]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [wêscakâsiyiw, wêscakâsisiyiw]

     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [mêscakâsa,     mêscakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nêscakâsa,     nêscakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kêscakâsa,     kêscakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nêscakâsinâna, nêscakâsisinâna]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kêscakâsinawa, kêscakâsisinawa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kêscakâsiwâwa, kêscakâsisiwâwa]
     
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [wêscakâsa,      wêscakâsisa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [wêscakâsiwâwa,  wêscakâsisiwâwa]
     mêstakay+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [wêscakâsiyiwa,  wêscakâsisiyiwa]
